Utah statutes.
31A-27a-110.   Cooperation of officers, owners, and employees.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Cooperate" includes to:
(i)  reply promptly in writing to an inquiry from the commissioner or receiver
requesting a reply; and
(ii)  promptly make available to the commissioner or receiver any record,
account, information, or property:
(A)  of or pertaining to the insurer; and
(B)  in the person's possession, custody, or control.
(b)  "Person" includes a person who exercises control directly or indirectly
over activities of the insurer through:
(i)  a holding company; or
(ii)  other affiliate of the insurer.
(2)  The following shall cooperate with the commissioner or receiver in a
proceeding under this chapter or an investigation preliminary to a proceeding
under this chapter:
(a)  a present or former officer, manager, director, trustee, owner, or
employee of an insurer;
(b)  a present or former agent of an insurer; or
(c)  a person with authority over or in charge of any segment of the insurer's
affairs.
(3)  A person may not obstruct or interfere with the commissioner or receiver
in the conduct of:
(a)  a delinquency proceeding; or
(b)  an investigation preliminary or incidental to a delinquency proceeding.
(4)  This section may not be construed to abridge otherwise existing legal
rights, including the right to resist:
(a)  a petition for liquidation or other delinquency proceeding; or
(b)  other orders.
(5) (a)  A person described in Subsection (5)(b) is:
(i)  guilty of a class B misdemeanor, except that the fine may exceed $1,000
but may not exceed $10,000; or
(ii)  after a hearing, subject to:
(A)  the commissioner imposing a civil penalty that may not exceed $10,000;
(B)  the revocation or suspension of an insurance license issued by the
commissioner; or
(C)  a combination of Subsections (5)(a)(ii)(A) and (B).
(b)  This Subsection (5) applies to:
(i)  a person described in Subsection (2) who fails to cooperate with the
commissioner or receiver;
(ii)  a person who obstructs or interferes with the commissioner or receiver
in the conduct of a delinquency proceeding or an investigation preliminary or
incidental to a delinquency proceeding; or
(iii)  a person who violates an order validly issued under this chapter.
